src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_USK !!≈ * **@CODE@** usk: 77
 NMN_USK	;

LEXICON N_VAŠK !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 78 vašk:vask
 NMN_VAŠK	;

LEXICON N_TUP !!≈ * **@CODE@** tup:tup 79
	N_TUP-SG	;
	N_TUP-PL	;
LEXICON N_TUP-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** tup:tup 79
     NMN_TUP-SG   ;
LEXICON N_TUP-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** tup:tup 79
     NMN_TUP-PL   ;

LEXICON N_BIS !!≈ * **@CODE@** bis:bis 79
	N_BIS-SG	;
	N_BIS-PL	;
LEXICON N_BIS-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** bis:bis 79
     NMN_BIS-SG   ;
LEXICON N_BIS-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** bis:bis 79
     NMN_BIS-PL   ;

LEXICON N_MAKS !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 80
 NMN_MAKS	;
LEXICON N_MAKS-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 80
     NMN_MAKS-PL   ;

LEXICON N_LUʼM !!≈ * **@CODE@** luʼm:lum 81
 NMN_LUʼM	;

LEXICON N_MIEʼR !!≈ * **@CODE@** mieʼr:mier 82
 NMN_MIEʼR	;

LEXICON N_MEʼR !!≈ * **@CODE@** meʼr:mer 83
 NMN_MEʼR	;

LEXICON N_MUʼR !!≈ * **@CODE@** muʼr:mur 84
 NMN_MUʼR	;

LEXICON N_KUOʼD !!≈ * **@CODE@** kuoʼd:kuod aig 85
        NMN_KUOʼD   ;

LEXICON N_SUʼŽ !!≈ * **@CODE@** suʼž:suž 86
 NMN_SUʼŽ	;

LEXICON N_KEʼŽ !!≈ * **@CODE@** keʼž:kež aim 87
        NMN_KEʼŽ   ;

LEXICON N_VEʼŽ !!≈ * **@CODE@** veʼž:veʼž 88
 NMN_VEʼŽ	;

LEXICON N_KUʼŽ !!≈ * **@CODE@** kuʼž:kuž 89
 NMN_KUʼŽ	;

LEXICON N_RUZŪ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 90
 NMN_RUZŪ	;

LEXICON N_RADIO !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 91
 NMN_RADIO	;

LEXICON N_ANG !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 92
 NMN_ANG	;

LEXICON N_KOUV !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 93
 NMN_KOUV	;

LEXICON N_KAND !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 94
!! kand:kand
  N_KAND-PL ;
  N_KAND-SG ;
LEXICON N_KAND-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 94
  NMN_KAND-SG ;
LEXICON N_KAND-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 94
  NMN_KAND-PL ;

LEXICON N_KAITS !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 94
!! kaits:kaits
  N_KAITS-PL ;
  N_KAITS-SG ;
LEXICON N_KAITS-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 94
  NMN_KAITS-SG ;
LEXICON N_KAITS-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 94
  NMN_KAITS-PL ;

LEXICON N_SERK !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 94
!! serk:serk
  N_SERK-PL ;
  N_SERK-SG ;
LEXICON N_SERK-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 94
  NMN_SERK-SG ;
LEXICON N_SERK-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 94
  NMN_SERK-PL ;

LEXICON N_PȮRT !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 95
 NMN_PȮRT	;

LEXICON N_NUŖM !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 96 nuŗm:nūrm
 NMN_NUŖM	;

LEXICON N_SUOŖM !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 96b suoŗm:sūorm
 NMN_SUOŖM	;

LEXICON N_LAINT !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 97
 NMN_LAINT	;

LEXICON N_LOUL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 98
 NMN_LOUL	;

LEXICON N_UL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 99 ul:ul
 NMN_UL	;

LEXICON N_PAN !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 100
 NMN_PAN	;

LEXICON N_TÄM !!≈ * **@CODE@** täm:tam 101 
 N_TÄM-SG    ;
 N_TÄM-PL    ;

LEXICON N_TÄM-SG
 NMN_TÄM-SG    ;
LEXICON N_TÄM-PL
 NMN_TÄM-PL    ;


LEXICON N_NIŖȚ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 102
 NMN_NIŖȚ	;

LEXICON N_KUĻ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 103
 NMN_KUĻ	;

LEXICON N_PAŅ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 104
 NMN_PAŅ	;

LEXICON N_DAŅTŠ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 105
 NMN_DAŅTŠ	;

LEXICON N_KOUŠ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 106
 NMN_KOUŠ	;

LEXICON N_SPLEIŠ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 107
 NMN_SPLEIŠ	;

LEXICON N_VEIS !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 108
 NMN_VEIS	;

LEXICON N_PȮIS !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 109 pȯis:pȯis
!!≈ * Yaml: **N-pois**
 N_PȮIS-SG ;
 N_PȮIS-PL ;
LEXICON N_PȮIS-SG
 NMN_PȮIS-SG	;
LEXICON N_PȮIS-PL
 NMN_PȮIS-PL	;

LEXICON N_KIĻG !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 110
 NMN_KIĻG	;

LEXICON N_VȮĻG !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 111
 NMN_VȮĻG	;

LEXICON N_TÄUŽ !!≈ * **@CODE@** täuž:täud adres 112
!! N_SgGen/d-Nom/ž-Par//ta
!! **täuž:täud**
  N_TÄUŽ-SG ;
  N_TÄUŽ-PL ;
LEXICON N_TÄUŽ-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 116
  NMN_TÄUŽ-SG ;
LEXICON N_TÄUŽ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 116
  NMN_TÄUŽ-PL ;


LEXICON N_VAŖŽ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 113
 NMN_VAŖŽ	;

LEXICON N_PIERZ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 114
 NMN_PIERZ	;

LEXICON N_VÕRGÕ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 115
 NMN_VÕRGÕ	;

LEXICON N_JÕUGÕ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 116
!! N_SgPar/VowsLI1/ța-PlPar/VowsRM/idi
!! **jõugõ:jõugõ**
	N_JÕUGÕ-SG	;
	N_JÕUGÕ-PL	;
LEXICON N_JÕUGÕ-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 116
 NMN_JÕUGÕ-SG	;
LEXICON N_JÕUGÕ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 116
 NMN_JÕUGÕ-PL	;

LEXICON N_VȬIDAG !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 117
 NMN_VȬIDAG	;

LEXICON N_SIELDÕ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 118
 NMN_SIELDÕ	;
LEXICON N_SIELDÕ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 118
     NMN_SIELDÕ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_NǬʼGÕ !!≈ * **@CODE@** nǭʼgõ:nǭgõ 119
 NMN_NǬʼGÕ	;
LEXICON N_NǬʼGÕ-PL	!!≈ * **@CODE@** nǭʼgõ:nǭgõ 119
     NMN_NǬʼGÕ-PL   ;

!LEXICON N_AŠŠÕ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 120
! N_AŠŠÕ-SG ;
! N_AŠŠÕ-PL ;
!LEXICON N_AŠŠÕ-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 120
! NMN_AŠŠÕ-SG	;
LEXICON N_AŠŠÕ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 120
     NMN_AŠŠÕ-PL   ;

!LEXICON N_DRŪʼOŠÕ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ drūʼošõ:drūošõ 121
! NMN_DRŪʼOŠÕ	;

LEXICON N_SOʼV !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 122
 NMN_SOʼV	;
LEXICON N_SOʼV-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 122
     NMN_SOʼV-PL   ;

LEXICON N_KǬJ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 123
 NMN_KǬJ	;
LEXICON N_KǬJ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 123
     NMN_KǬJ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_ǬʼJ !!≈ * **@CODE@** ǭʼj:ǭj 124
 NMN_ǬʼJ	;

LEXICON N_IRM !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 125
 NMN_IRM	  ;
LEXICON N_IRM-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 125
     NMN_IRM-PL   ;

LEXICON N_KIM !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 126
 NMN_KIM	;
LEXICON N_KIM-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 126
     NMN_KIM-SG   ;
LEXICON N_KIM-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 126
     NMN_KIM-PL   ;

LEXICON N_PLUS !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 126b
 NMN_PLUS	;

LEXICON N_VȮŅ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 127
 NMN_VȮŅ	;

LEXICON N_VAʼIT !!≈ * **@CODE@** vaʼit:vait 128
 NMN_VAʼIT	;

LEXICON N_VAʼIT-PL	!!≈ * **@CODE@** vaʼit:vait 128
     NMN_VAʼIT-PL   ;

LEXICON N_AMĀT !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 129
 NMN_AMĀT	;

LEXICON N_AMĀT-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 129
     NMN_AMĀT-PL   ;

LEXICON N_KULTŪR !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 130
 NMN_AMĀT	;

LEXICON N_SAʼGDIT !!≈ * **@CODE@** saʼgdit:sagdit 131
 NMN_AMĀT	;

LEXICON N_VIĻȚ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 132
 NMN_VIĻȚ	;
LEXICON N_VIĻȚ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 132
     NMN_VIĻȚ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_GĒRMAŅ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 132
 NMN_GĒRMAŅ	;
LEXICON N_GĒRMAŅ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 132
     NMN_GĒRMAŅ-PL   ;


LEXICON N_EĻ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 133
 NMN_EĻ	;

LEXICON N_BLĒʼḐ !!≈ * **@CODE@** blēʼḑ:blēʼḑ 134
	N_BLĒʼḐ-SG	;
	N_BLĒʼḐ-PL	;

LEXICON N_BLĒʼḐ-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** blēʼḑ:blēʼḑ 134
 NMN_BLĒʼḐ-SG	;
LEXICON N_BLĒʼḐ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** blēʼḑ:blēʼḑ 134
 NMN_BLĒʼḐ-PL	;

LEXICON N_FAKT !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 135
 NMN_FAKT	;
LEXICON N_FAKT-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 135
     NMN_FAKT-PL   ;

LEXICON N_TAS !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 136
 NMN_TAS	;

LEXICON N_NEITST !!≈ * **@CODE@** neitst:neits 137
 NMN_NEITST	;

!LEXICON N_SĪEND !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 138
! NMN_SĪEND	;

!LEXICON N_LǞʼND !!≈ * __@CODE@__ lǟʼnd:lǟnd 139
! NMN_LǞʼND	;

LEXICON N_ĀIGAST !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 140
 NMN_ĀIGAST   ;
LEXICON N_ĀIGAST-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 140
 NMN_ĀIGAST-PL	;

LEXICON N_ADRES !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 140
 NMN_ADRES ;! wasĀIGAST   

LEXICON N_ANALĪZ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 141
 	NMN_ANALĪZ ;

LEXICON N_NĪʼEM !!≈ * **@CODE@** nīʼem:nīem 142
 	NMN_NĪʼEM ;

LEXICON N_KĪʼL !!≈ * **@CODE@** nīʼem:nīem 142
 	NMN_KĪʼL ;

LEXICON N_JAĻKŠ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 143
 NMN_JAĻKŠ	;

LEXICON N_JAĻKŠ-PL	!!≈ * **@CODE@** : 143
     NMN_JAĻKŠ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_VIŠ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 144 viš:viš
	N_VIŠ-SG	;
	N_VIŠ-PL	;
LEXICON N_VIŠ-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 144
 NMN_VIŠ-SG	;
LEXICON N_VIŠ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 144
 NMN_VIŠ-PL	;

LEXICON N_RŪʼTŠ !!≈ * **@CODE@** rūʼtš:rūtš 145
 NMN_RŪʼTŠ	;

LEXICON N_RŪʼTŠ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** rūʼtš:rūtš 145
     NMN_RŪʼTŠ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_TĒʼḐ !!≈ * **@CODE@** tēʼḑ:tēḑ 146
 NMN_TĒʼḐ	;

LEXICON N_LĒʼḐ !!≈ * **@CODE@** lēʼḑ:lēḑ 147
 NMN_LĒʼḐ	;
LEXICON N_LĒʼḐ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** lēʼḑ:lēḑ 147
     NMN_LĒʼḐ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_KĪNTŠ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 148
 NMN_KĪNTŠ	;

LEXICON N_KǬŅTŠ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 149
 NMN_KǬŅTŠ	;

LEXICON N_LĒŅTŠ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 150
 NMN_LĒŅTŠ	;

LEXICON N_LĪEM !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 151
 NMN_LĪEM	;

LEXICON N_AʼM !!≈ * **@CODE@** aʼm:am 152
 NMN_AʼM	;

LEXICON N_AZŪM !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 153 azūm:aʼzūm
	N_AZŪM-SG	;
	N_AZŪM-PL	;
LEXICON N_AZŪM-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 153
     NMN_AZŪM-SG   ;
LEXICON N_AZŪM-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 153
     NMN_AZŪM-PL   ;

LEXICON N_VÕȚĪM !!≈ * **@CODE@** võțīm:võțīm 154 
	N_VÕȚĪM-SG	;
	N_VÕȚĪM-PL	;
LEXICON N_VÕȚĪM-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 154
 	NMN_VÕȚĪM-SG ;
LEXICON N_VÕȚĪM-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 154
 NMN_VÕȚĪM-PL   ;

LEXICON N_KǬŅIM !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 155
	N_KǬŅIM-SG	;
	N_KǬŅIM-PL	;
LEXICON N_KǬŅIM-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 155
 NMN_KǬŅIM-SG   ;
