src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
bril+N:bril N_KIM-SG  "silmälasit" ;
bērõd+N:bēʼr N_VAʼIT-PL  "hautajaistilaisuus" ;
dillõd+N:dil N_KIM-PL  "tilli" ;
fekālõd+N:fekāl N_AMĀT-PL  "ulosteet" ;
jetmõd+N:jetīm N_VÕȚĪM-PL  "jäännökset" ;
jõugõ+N:jȭugõ N_JÕUGÕ  "hiekka" ;
jõugõd+N:jȭugõ N_JÕUGÕ-PL  "" ;
jōņõd+N:jǭņ N_GĒRMAŅ-PL  "juhannus" ;
kiļg+N:kīlg N_KIĻG  "kylki" ;
kopij+N:kopij N_KǬJ  "kopio" ;
kouv+N:kōuv N_KOUV  "kaivo" ;
kuod+N:kuoʼd N_KUOʼD  "koti" ;
kuž+N:kuʼz N_KUʼŽ  "kusi" ;
kõurõkež+N:kõʼurõ#käʼd N_KEʼŽ  "lahjus" ;
lejākīntš+N:lejā#kīn N_KĪNTŠ  "hevosen kavio" ;
lum+N:luʼm N_LUʼM  "lumi" ;
lēņtš+N:lǟn N_LĒŅTŠ  "lounas" ;
lētšõd+N:lēʼtš N_RŪʼTŠ-PL  "" ;
mask+N:mask N_USK  "naamio" ;
messias+N:messias N_ADRES  "messias" ;
mōškõdzapt+N:mǭškõd#zapt N_MAKS  "mansikkahillo" ;
nerts+N:nerts N_KAITS  "vesikko" ;
nougõd+N:noʼugõ N_NǬʼGÕ-PL  "noki" ;
num+N:num N_UL  "kangas" ;
nūoļõdtup+N:nūoļõd#tup N_TUP  "nuolikotelo" ;
nōvõ+N:nǭʼvõ N_NǬʼGÕ  "kuolema" ;
ovd+N:oʼv N_SOʼV-PL  "havupuun oksat" ;
pierz+N:pīerz N_PIERZ  "perse" ;
pivtäuž+N:piʼv#täud N_TÄUŽ  "kourallinen" ;
plus+N:plus N_PLUS  "plussa" ;
plēšõd+N:plēš N_JAĻKŠ-PL  "palkeet" ;
plūmõdlīem+N:plūmõd#līem N_LĪEM  "luumumehu" ;
predikāt+N:predikāt N_AMĀT  "predikaatti" ;
puņtš+N:puņtš N_DAŅTŠ  "mutru" ;
pēgalpȯis+N:pēgal#p N_PȮIS  "peukaloinen" ;
pūvīļaveis+N:pūvīļa#vēis N_VEIS  "hedelmäveitsi" ;
pǟnouk+N:pǟn#ouk N_LOUL  "kaula-aukko" ;
pōļ+N:pǭļ N_GĒRMAŅ  "paalu" ;
pȯrt+N:p N_PȮRT  "huora" ;
pȯj+N:pȯʼj N_SOʼV  "povi" ;
radio+N:radio N_RADIO  "radio" ;
restūd+N:rest N_MAKS-PL  "säleikkö" ;
rokkouš+N:rok#kōuš N_KOUŠ  "keittokulho" ;
rokpaņ+N:rok#paņ N_PAŅ  "hapatetun jauhojuoman astia" ;
rovrõkūd+N:roʼv#rõk N_TUP-PL  "huhu" ;
rõkain+N:rõk#ain N_KAND  "puheenaihe" ;
rīj+N:rīʼj N_ǬʼJ  "riihi" ;
rīvȯŗž+N:rīʼ#vȱrd N_VAŖŽ  "parsi" ;
rūožpȭzõ+N:rūož#pȭzõ N_SIELDÕ  "ruusupensas" ;
rūtš+N:rūʼtš N_RŪʼTŠ  "motkottaja" ;
rōresursõd+N:rǭ#resurs N_ĀIGAST-PL  "rahavarat" ;
santīm+N:santīm N_ANALĪZ  "santiimi" ;
sidtaņgõd+N:siʼd#taņg N_FAKT-PL  "hiilipihdit" ;
spleiš+N:splēiš N_SPLEIŠ  "pujos" ;
spēršk+N:spēršk N_FAKT  "värssy" ;
studijõd+N:studij N_KǬJ-PL  "opinnot" ;
stuņḑ+N:stūņḑ N_NIŖȚ  "tunti" ;
suoŗm+N:sūorm N_SUOŖM  "sormi" ;
supīn+N:supīn N_KULTŪR  "supiini" ;
sõbritsidmõd+N:sõʼbrit#siʼdūm N_AZŪM-PL  "ystävyyssiteet" ;
sīpõltāimõd+N:sīpõl#tāim N_KAND-PL  "sipulikasvit" ;
tabārtīb+N:tabār#tīb N_IRM  "pyrstöevä" ;
tagākōņtš+N:tagā#kǭn N_KǬŅTŠ  "takakansi" ;
tigīm+N:tiʼgīm N_AZŪM  "aivot" ;
toļ+N:tōļ N_KUĻ  "hanka" ;
tsepītpan+N:tsepīt#pǭn N_PAN  "paistinpannu" ;
tsitrōnvȭidag+N:tsitrōn#vȭidag N_VȬIDAG  "sitruunavoi" ;
tubākerk+N:tubā#kerk N_SERK  "kotisirkka" ;
tulsiž+N:tuʼl#siʼd N_SUʼŽ  "hehkuva hiili" ;
tējtas+N:tēj#tas N_TAS  "teekuppi" ;
tīekūož+N:tīe#kūož N_JAĻKŠ  "työpaikka" ;
tšiļtšaļ+N:tšiļ#tšaļ N_EĻ  "peukaloinen" ;
tūgõtuš+N:tūʼgõ#tuš N_VIŠ  "maamuna" ;
tūr+N:tūʼr N_VAʼIT  "nurkka" ;
vang+N:vāng N_ANG  "luhta" ;
vanāmier+N:vanā#mīeʼr N_MIEʼR  "muinaismeri" ;
vanāmäm+N:vanā#mäm N_KIM  "mummu" ;
vanāneitst+N:vanā#neits N_NEITST  "vanhapiika" ;
vetō+N:vetō N_RUZŪ  "veto" ;
ver+N:vīeʼr N_MEʼR  "veri" ;
vež+N:vieʼd N_VEʼŽ  "vesi" ;
viltsīņtõblīedõd+N:viltsīņtõb#līʼed N_LĒʼḐ-PL  "sapilaat" ;
virt+N:viʼrt N_KĪʼL  "veden väreily" ;
võțīm+N:võțīm N_VÕȚĪM  "avain" ;
vāldavašk+N:vālda#vask N_VAŠK  "messinki" ;
vīkõd+N:vīk N_IRM-PL  "virnat" ;
vȯļg+N:vȱlg N_VȮĻG  "olki" ;
vȯddõrnuŗm+N:vȯʼddõr#nūrm N_NUŖM  "ohrapelto" ;
vȯl+N:vȯʼl N_AʼM  "olut" ;
zuļț+N:zuļț N_VIĻȚ  "lihahyytelö" ;
zīed+N:zīʼed N_NĪʼEM  "uhrilahja" ;
äbvȯņ+N:äʼb#vȱn N_VȮŅ  "epäonni" ;
āinalēḑ+N:āina#līʼed N_LĒʼḐ  "ruohonlehti" ;
āinatus+N:āina#tus N_BIS  "heinätuppo" ;
ēbrikšvõrgõ+N:ēbrikš#vȭrgõ N_VÕRGÕ  "hämähäkinseitti" ;
īekšõd+N:īekšõ N_AŠŠÕ-PL  "sisälmykset" ;
ītit+N:īʼtit N_SAʼGDIT  "samankaltaisuus" ;
škēļ+N:škēʼļ N_BLĒʼḐ  "viipale" ;
ūsõd+N:ūsõ N_SIELDÕ-PL  "viikset" ;
ūoļmõar+N:ūʼoļmõ#aʼr N_MUʼR  "ohjat" ;
ōŗalaint+N:ǭŗa#lāint N_LAINT  "rantatyrsky" ;
miertēḑ+N:mieʼr#tǟʼd N_TĒʼḐ  "meritähti" ;
korktäm+N:kork#tǭm N_TÄM  "korkkitammi" ;
kosmopolītism+N:kosmopolītism N_ĀIGAST  "kosmopolitismi" ;
